Missouri, session 2026, SB1290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.207, to read as
follows:
167.207. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Healthy Schools Act".
2. For the purposes of this section, "ultraprocessed
food" means a food or beverage that contains one or more of
the following ingredients:
(1) Potassium bromate;
(2) Propylparaben;
(3) Titanium dioxide;
(4) Brominated vegetable oil;
(5) Yellow dye 5;
(6) Yellow dye 6;
(7) Blue dye 1;
(8) Blue dye 2;
(9) Green dye 3;
(10) Red dye 3;
(11) Red dye 40.

SB 1290 2
3. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year and for all
subsequent school years, any school that participates in a
federally funded or assisted meal program shall not serve,
sell, or allow a third party to sell ultraprocessed food on
the school campus during the school day. This subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit a student's parent or
guardian from providing ultraprocessed food to the student
during the school day.
4. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall post on the department's website both of the
following:
(1) A standardized form that a public school may use
to certify that the public school is complying with the
requirements of this section; and
(2) A list of each public school that has certified to
the department that the public school is complying with the
requirements of this section.
✓